Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 15.140.020 and 2023 c 365 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Agriculture improvement act of 2018" means sections 7605, 10113, 10114, and 12619 of the agriculture improvement act of 2018, P.L. 115-334.(2) "Cannabis" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.50.101.(3) "Container" means the innermost bottle, can, jar, bag, box, cartridge, or other receptacle that is in direct contact with a hemp-derived cannabinoid product and is used for retail sale to a consumer.(4) "Crop" means hemp grown as an agricultural commodity.(((4)))(5) "Cultivar" means a variation of the plant Cannabis sativa L. that has been developed through cultivation by selective breeding.(((5)))(6) "Department" means the Washington state department of agriculture.(((6)))(7) "Food" has the same meaning as defined in RCW 69.07.010.(((7)))(8) "Hemp" means the plant Cannabis sativa L. and any part of that plant, including the seeds thereof and all derivatives, extracts, cannabinoids, isomers, acids, salts, and salts of isomers, whether growing or not, with a ((delta-9))total tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of not more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis, measured after decarboxylation.(((8)))(9) "Hemp consumable" means a product that is sold or provided to another person, that is:(a) Made of hemp;(b) Not a cannabis product, as defined in RCW 69.50.101; and(c) Intended to be consumed or absorbed inside the body by any means, including inhalation, ingestion, or insertion.(((9)))(10) "Hemp-derived cannabinoid product" means a hemp consumable that contains one or more cannabinoids derived from hemp, including tetrahydrocannabinols, and is packaged in a container for retail sale.(11) "Hemp processor" means a person who takes possession of raw hemp material with the intent to modify, package, or sell a transitional or finished hemp product.(((10)(a) "Industrial hemp" means all parts and varieties of the genera Cannabis, cultivated or possessed by a grower, whether growing or not, that contain a tetrahydrocannabinol concentration of 0.3 percent or less by dry weight that was grown under the industrial hemp research program as it existed on December 31, 2019.(b) "Industrial hemp" does not include plants of the genera Cannabis that meet the definition of "cannabis."(11)))(12) "Postharvest test" means a test of ((tetrahydrocannabinol concentration levels of hemp after being harvested based on:(a) Ground whole plant samples without heat applied; or(b) Other approved testing methods))hemp after harvest for the purpose of determining the total level of delta-9 tetrahydrocannabinol concentration on a dry weight basis.(((12)))(13) "Process" means ((the processing, compounding, or conversion of hemp into hemp commodities or products))a method of preparing hemp or hemp products and includes, but is not limited to, decortication, devitalization, extraction, crushing, packaging, or changing the form of the hemp, or changing the hemp into a hemp product.(((13)))(14) "Produce" or "production" means the planting, cultivation, growing, or harvesting of hemp including hemp seed.(15) "Total tetrahydrocannabinols" means the sum of tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid and any other tetrahydrocannabinol isomers included in federal law for purposes of determining compliance with hemp standards, calculated on a molar basis as provided in federal regulations.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 15.140 RCW to read as follows:(1) A hemp-derived cannabinoid product remains hemp and a hemp consumable for the purposes of this chapter only if:(a) The hemp used to produce the product meets the definition of hemp in RCW 15.140.020, including the 0.3 percent total tetrahydrocannabinols dry-weight limit; and(b) The product contains not more than 0.4 milligrams combined total per container of:(i) Total tetrahydrocannabinols; and(ii) Any other cannabinoids that federal law or the United States department of health and human services determines have effects on humans or animals that are similar to tetrahydrocannabinols, or that are marketed as having such effects.(2) A hemp-derived cannabinoid product does not qualify as hemp or as a hemp consumable under this chapter if it:(a) Contains a cannabinoid that cannot be produced naturally by the Cannabis sativa L. plant; or(b) Contains a naturally occurring cannabinoid that has been synthesized or manufactured outside of the plant.(3)(a) A person may not sell, furnish, or transfer a hemp consumable that contains any detectable amount of tetrahydrocannabinols, including any hemp-derived cannabinoid product, to a person under 21 years of age.(b) A person purchasing a hemp consumable described in (a) of this subsection must be at least 21 years of age and must present satisfactory evidence of age in a form permitted for age-restricted products under state law.(4) Any hemp-derived cannabinoid product that does not comply with subsections (1) and (2) of this section, or that is sold or distributed in violation of subsection (3) of this section, is not a hemp consumable under this chapter and is subject to regulation and enforcement as cannabis or a cannabis product, as those terms are defined in RCW 69.50.101 and related provisions.(5) The department may adopt rules to implement this section including, but not limited to, testing, recordkeeping, and labeling requirements necessary to determine compliance with the per container limit established in subsection (1)(b) of this section, and to ensure appropriate age verification at the point of sale.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. A new section is added to chapter 15.140 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a) A person may not manufacture, distribute, or sell a hemp-derived cannabinoid product in this state unless the product and its product formulation are registered annually with the department, as provided in this section.(b) For purposes of this subsection, "product formulation" means a distinct combination of:(i) Active hemp-derived ingredients including total tetrahydrocannabinols;(ii) Product form and delivery system including, but not limited to, beverage, edible, capsule, or tincture; and(iii) Strength or concentration of active ingredients per serving.(2) The department shall establish by rule an annual hemp-derived cannabinoid product registration program. At a minimum, the rules must:(a) Require a separate registration for each product formulation;(b) Require submission of product labels, ingredient lists, and certificates of analysis from a qualifying laboratory;(c) Establish procedures for renewal, modification, and cancellation of registrations; and(d) Provide for suspension and revocation of a registration for violations of this chapter or rules adopted under it.(3)(a) The department shall assess an annual registration fee for each hemp-derived cannabinoid product formulation.(b) The department shall set the amount of the registration fee by rule, but in no case may the annual registration fee be less than $2,500 per product formulation per year.(c) Registration fees collected under this subsection (3) must be deposited in the hemp regulatory account created in RCW 15.140.080 for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.(4)(a) A person who manufactures, distributes, or sells a hemp-derived cannabinoid product in this state that is not registered with the department as required under this section is subject to a civil penalty of up to $10,000 per product, per day, in addition to any other remedy available under state law.(b) Each distinct product formulation and each day of violation is a separate violation for purposes of assessing civil penalties under this subsection (4).(5) In addition to civil penalties under subsection (4) of this section, the department may:(a) Issue a stop-sale, stop-distribution, or embargo order for any noncompliant product;(b) Refer violations to the Washington state liquor and cannabis board or the attorney general for investigation and enforcement as unlicensed cannabis activity when the product meets the definition of cannabis or cannabis product under chapter 69.50 RCW; and(c) Seek injunctive relief in superior court to prevent ongoing or threatened violations of this chapter.(6) The department may coordinate product registration and enforcement activities under this section with other department programs regulating food processing, labeling, and consumer protection, but retains primary responsibility for administration of this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. A new section is added to chapter 69.50 RCW to read as follows:(1) A licensed cannabis processor may manufacture, package, and label products that meet the definition of a hemp consumable and a hemp-derived cannabinoid product under chapter 15.140 RCW, including products containing tetrahydrocannabinols, only if:(a) The hemp and hemp-derived ingredients used in the product meet the definition of hemp in RCW 15.140.020, including the total tetrahydrocannabinols concentration of not more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis;(b) Each finished product container contains not more than 0.4 milligrams total tetrahydrocannabinols per container, as provided in chapter 15.140 RCW; and(c) The product otherwise complies with all requirements of chapter 15.140 RCW and rules adopted under that chapter, including any product registration, testing, labeling, and age restriction requirements.(2) A licensed cannabis processor that manufactures products under subsection (1) of this section:(a) Must hold and maintain a valid processor license under this chapter;(b) Is subject to all applicable rules of the board governing processing operations, recordkeeping, testing, packaging, and labeling; and(c) May sell or transfer such products to:(i) Other licenses under this chapter for further processing or distribution; and(ii) Any person or entity for resale or retail sale in this state including, but not limited to, grocery stores, convenience stores, and other noncannabis retail outlets, so long as the products comply with chapter 15.140 RCW, are registered with the department of agriculture, do not exceed the 0.4 milligram total tetrahydrocannabinols per container limit, and are sold in accordance with applicable age restriction requirements.(3) Products manufactured under this section that do not comply with the 0.4 milligram per container limit or other requirements of chapter 15.140 RCW are cannabis products and must comply with all provisions of this chapter and rules adopted under it and may not be represented or sold as hemp consumables.(4) The board may adopt rules to implement this section, including rules:(a) Governing the use of hemp and hemp-derived ingredients by licensed cannabis processors;(b) Establishing traceability, segregation, and recordkeeping requirements for hemp-derived cannabinoid products manufactured by licensed cannabis processors; and(c) Coordinating with the department of agriculture to avoid duplication of testing or registration requirements where practical.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. The department may adopt rules necessary to implement sections 1 and 2 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. A new section is added to chapter 82.32 RCW to read as follows:(1)(a)There is levied and collected a hemp-derived cannabinoid product tax equal to 10 percent of the selling price on each retail sale of a hemp-derived cannabinoid product. This tax is separate and in addition to general state and local sales and use taxes that apply to retail sales of tangible personal property, and is not part of the total retail price to which general state and local sales and use taxes apply. The tax must be separately itemized from the state and local retail sales tax on the sales receipt provided to the buyer.(b) The tax levied in this section must be reflected in the price list or quoted price at the licensed premises and in any advertising that includes prices for all hemp-derived cannabinoid products.(2) For revenues collected from the hemp-derived cannabinoid product tax imposed under this section, 50 percent must be deposited each day in the hemp regulatory account established in RCW 15.140.080 and 50 percent must be deposited in the state general fund.(3) The tax imposed in this section must be paid by the buyer to the seller. Each seller must collect from the buyer the full amount of the tax payable on each taxable sale. The tax collected as required by this section is deemed to be held in trust by the seller until paid to the department. If any seller fails to collect the tax imposed in this section or, having collected the tax, fails to pay it as prescribed by the department, whether such failure is the result of the seller's own acts or the result of acts or conditions beyond the seller's control, the seller is, nevertheless, personally liable to the state for the amount of the tax.(4) The definitions in this subsection apply throughout this section unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(a) "Hemp-derived cannabinoid product" has the same meaning as in RCW 15.140.020.(b) "Retail sale" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010.(c) "Selling price" has the same meaning as in RCW 82.08.010, except that when a product is sold under circumstances where the total amount of consideration paid for the product is not indicative of its true value, "selling price" means the true value of the product sold.(d) "True value" means market value based on sales at comparable locations in this state of the same or similar product of like quality and character sold under comparable conditions of sale to comparable purchasers. However, in the absence of such sales of the same or similar product, true value means the value of the product sold as determined by all of the seller's direct and indirect costs attributable to the product.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. A new section is added to chapter 15.140 RCW to read as follows:The legislature does not intend and does not authorize any person or entity to engage in activities or to conspire to engage in activities that would constitute per se violations of state and federal antitrust laws including, but not limited to, agreements among retailers as to the selling price of any goods sold.Sec. 8. RCW 69.50.101 and 2024 c 62 s 17 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:(a) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or(b) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.(2) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.(3) "Board" means the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.(4) "Cannabis" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis during the growing cycle through harvest and usable cannabis. "Cannabis" does not include hemp or industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.140.020, or seeds used for licensed hemp production under chapter 15.140 RCW.(5) "Cannabis concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ((ten))10 percent.(6) "Cannabis processor" means a person licensed by the board to process cannabis into cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products, package and label cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products at wholesale to cannabis retailers.(7) "Cannabis producer" means a person licensed by the board to produce and sell cannabis at wholesale to cannabis processors and other cannabis producers.(8)(a) "Cannabis products" means useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, and cannabis-infused products as defined in this section, including any product intended to be consumed or absorbed inside the body by any means including inhalation, ingestion, or insertion, with ((any detectable amount of THC))a total THC concentration of more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis.(b) "Cannabis products" also means any product containing only THC content.(c) "Cannabis products" does not include cannabis health and beauty aids as defined in RCW 69.50.575 or products approved by the United States food and drug administration.(9) "Cannabis researcher" means a person licensed by the board to produce, process, and possess cannabis for the purposes of conducting research on cannabis and cannabis-derived drug products.(10) "Cannabis retailer" means a person licensed by the board to sell cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products in a retail outlet.(11) "Cannabis-infused products" means products that contain cannabis or cannabis extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from cannabis as defined in subsection (4) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ((ten))10 percent. The term "cannabis-infused products" does not include either useable cannabis or cannabis concentrates.(12) "CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(13) "CBD product" means any product containing or consisting of cannabidiol.(14) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.(15) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules, but does not include hemp or industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.140.020.(16)(a) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.(b) The term does not include:(i) a controlled substance;(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, or chapter 69.77 RCW to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.(17) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.(18) "Department" means the department of health.(19) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(20) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.(21) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.(22) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.(23) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.(24) "Drug" means (a) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (b) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (c) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (d) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.(25) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.(26) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.(27) "Immature plant or clone" means a plant or clone that has no flowers, is less than ((twelve))12 inches in height, and is less than ((twelve))12 inches in diameter.(28) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:(a) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;(b) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and(c) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.(29) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (33)(e) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(1) (l) and (hh), and 69.50.206(2)(d), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(1) (h) and (pp)((,)) and 69.50.210(3)(([,])), the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(1)(ii), 69.50.204(3), and 69.50.208(1)(([,])), the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.(30) "Lot" means a definite quantity of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.(31) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused product.(32) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:(a) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or(b) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.(33) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:(a) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.(b) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.(c) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.(d) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.(e) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.(f) Cocaine base.(g) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.(h) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in (a) through (g) of this subsection.(34) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.(35) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.(36) "Package" means a container that has a single unit or group of units.(37) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.(38) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(39) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.(40) "Practitioner" means:(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.(b) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical commission or equivalent and his or her participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, an advanced registered nurse practitioner licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.(41) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.(42) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.(43) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(44) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(45) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the board for the retail sale of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products.(46) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.(47) "Social equity plan" means a plan that addresses at least some of the elements outlined in this subsection (47), along with any additional plan components or requirements approved by the board following consultation with the task force created in RCW 69.50.336. The plan may include:(a) A statement that indicates how the cannabis licensee will work to promote social equity goals in their community;(b) A description of how the cannabis licensee will meet social equity goals as defined in RCW 69.50.335;(c) The composition of the workforce the licensee has employed or intends to hire; and(d) Business plans involving partnerships or assistance to organizations or residents with connections to populations with a history of high rates of enforcement of cannabis prohibition.(48) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.(49) "THC concentration" means percent of tetrahydrocannabinol content of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of cannabis product, or the combined percent of tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.(50) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.(51) "Unit" means an individual consumable item within a package of one or more consumable items in solid, liquid, gas, or any form intended for human consumption.(52) "Useable cannabis" means dried cannabis flowers. The term "useable cannabis" does not include either cannabis-infused products or cannabis concentrates.(53) "Youth access" means the level of interest persons under the age of ((twenty-one))21 may have in a vapor product, as well as the degree to which the product is available or appealing to such persons, and the likelihood of initiation, use, or addiction by adolescents and young adults.Sec. 9. RCW 69.50.101 and 2025 c 58 s 5126 are each amended to read as follows:The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.(1) "Administer" means to apply a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, directly to the body of a patient or research subject by:(a) a practitioner authorized to prescribe (or, by the practitioner's authorized agent); or(b) the patient or research subject at the direction and in the presence of the practitioner.(2) "Agent" means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseperson, or employee of the carrier or warehouseperson.(3) "Board" means the Washington state liquor and cannabis board.(4) "Cannabis" means all parts of the plant Cannabis, whether growing or not, with a THC concentration greater than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis during the growing cycle through harvest and usable cannabis. "Cannabis" does not include hemp or industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.140.020, or seeds used for licensed hemp production under chapter 15.140 RCW.(5) "Cannabis concentrates" means products consisting wholly or in part of the resin extracted from any part of the plant Cannabis and having a THC concentration greater than ((ten))10 percent.(6) "Cannabis processor" means a person licensed by the board to process cannabis into cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products, package and label cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products for sale in retail outlets, and sell cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products at wholesale to cannabis retailers.(7) "Cannabis producer" means a person licensed by the board to produce and sell cannabis at wholesale to cannabis processors and other cannabis producers.(8)(a) "Cannabis products" means useable cannabis, cannabis concentrates, and cannabis-infused products as defined in this section, including any product intended to be consumed or absorbed inside the body by any means including inhalation, ingestion, or insertion, with ((any detectable amount of THC))a total THC concentration of more than 0.3 percent on a dry weight basis.(b) "Cannabis products" also means any product containing only THC content.(c) "Cannabis products" does not include cannabis health and beauty aids as defined in RCW 69.50.575 or products approved by the United States food and drug administration.(9) "Cannabis researcher" means a person licensed by the board to produce, process, and possess cannabis for the purposes of conducting research on cannabis and cannabis-derived drug products.(10) "Cannabis retailer" means a person licensed by the board to sell cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products in a retail outlet.(11) "Cannabis-infused products" means products that contain cannabis or cannabis extracts, are intended for human use, are derived from cannabis as defined in subsection (4) of this section, and have a THC concentration no greater than ((ten))10 percent. The term "cannabis-infused products" does not include either useable cannabis or cannabis concentrates.(12) "CBD concentration" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(13) "CBD product" means any product containing or consisting of cannabidiol.(14) "Commission" means the pharmacy quality assurance commission.(15) "Controlled substance" means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor included in Schedules I through V as set forth in federal or state laws, or federal or commission rules, but does not include hemp or industrial hemp as defined in RCW 15.140.020.(16)(a) "Controlled substance analog" means a substance the chemical structure of which is substantially similar to the chemical structure of a controlled substance in Schedule I or II and:(i) that has a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II; or(ii) with respect to a particular individual, that the individual represents or intends to have a stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system substantially similar to the stimulant, depressant, or hallucinogenic effect on the central nervous system of a controlled substance included in Schedule I or II.(b) The term does not include:(i) a controlled substance;(ii) a substance for which there is an approved new drug application;(iii) a substance with respect to which an exemption is in effect for investigational use by a particular person under Section 505 of the federal food, drug, and cosmetic act, 21 U.S.C. Sec. 355, or chapter 69.77 RCW to the extent conduct with respect to the substance is pursuant to the exemption; or(iv) any substance to the extent not intended for human consumption before an exemption takes effect with respect to the substance.(17) "Deliver" or "delivery" means the actual or constructive transfer from one person to another of a substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship.(18) "Department" means the department of health.(19) "Designated provider" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(20) "Dispense" means the interpretation of a prescription or order for a controlled substance and, pursuant to that prescription or order, the proper selection, measuring, compounding, labeling, or packaging necessary to prepare that prescription or order for delivery.(21) "Dispenser" means a practitioner who dispenses.(22) "Distribute" means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance.(23) "Distributor" means a person who distributes.(24) "Drug" means (a) a controlled substance recognized as a drug in the official United States pharmacopoeia/national formulary or the official homeopathic pharmacopoeia of the United States, or any supplement to them; (b) controlled substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in individuals or animals; (c) controlled substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of individuals or animals; and (d) controlled substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in (a), (b), or (c) of this subsection. The term does not include devices or their components, parts, or accessories.(25) "Drug enforcement administration" means the drug enforcement administration in the United States Department of Justice, or its successor agency.(26) "Electronic communication of prescription information" means the transmission of a prescription or refill authorization for a drug of a practitioner using computer systems. The term does not include a prescription or refill authorization verbally transmitted by telephone nor a facsimile manually signed by the practitioner.(27) "Immature plant or clone" means a plant or clone that has no flowers, is less than ((twelve))12 inches in height, and is less than ((twelve))12 inches in diameter.(28) "Immediate precursor" means a substance:(a) that the commission has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used, or produced primarily for use, in the manufacture of a controlled substance;(b) that is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance; and(c) the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit the manufacture of the controlled substance.(29) "Isomer" means an optical isomer, but in subsection (33)(e) of this section, RCW 69.50.204(1) (l) and (hh), and 69.50.206(2)(d), the term includes any geometrical isomer; in RCW 69.50.204(1) (h) and (pp) and 69.50.210(3), the term includes any positional isomer; and in RCW 69.50.204(1)(ii), 69.50.204(3), and 69.50.208(1), the term includes any positional or geometric isomer.(30) "Lot" means a definite quantity of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused product identified by a lot number, every portion or package of which is uniform within recognized tolerances for the factors that appear in the labeling.(31) "Lot number" must identify the licensee by business or trade name and Washington state unified business identifier number, and the date of harvest or processing for each lot of cannabis, cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, or cannabis-infused product.(32) "Manufacture" means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly or by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging, repackaging, labeling, or relabeling of a controlled substance:(a) by a practitioner as an incident to the practitioner's administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of the practitioner's professional practice; or(b) by a practitioner, or by the practitioner's authorized agent under the practitioner's supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.(33) "Narcotic drug" means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:(a) Opium, opium derivative, and any derivative of opium or opium derivative, including their salts, isomers, and salts of isomers, whenever the existence of the salts, isomers, and salts of isomers is possible within the specific chemical designation. The term does not include the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium.(b) Synthetic opiate and any derivative of synthetic opiate, including their isomers, esters, ethers, salts, and salts of isomers, esters, and ethers, whenever the existence of the isomers, esters, ethers, and salts is possible within the specific chemical designation.(c) Poppy straw and concentrate of poppy straw.(d) Coca leaves, except coca leaves and extracts of coca leaves from which cocaine, ecgonine, and derivatives or ecgonine or their salts have been removed.(e) Cocaine, or any salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.(f) Cocaine base.(g) Ecgonine, or any derivative, salt, isomer, or salt of isomer thereof.(h) Any compound, mixture, or preparation containing any quantity of any substance referred to in (a) through (g) of this subsection.(34) "Opiate" means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. The term includes opium, substances derived from opium (opium derivatives), and synthetic opiates. The term does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under RCW 69.50.201, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinan and its salts (dextromethorphan). The term includes the racemic and levorotatory forms of dextromethorphan.(35) "Opium poppy" means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds.(36) "Package" means a container that has a single unit or group of units.(37) "Person" means individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.(38) "Plant" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(39) "Poppy straw" means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing.(40) "Practitioner" means:(a) A physician under chapter 18.71 RCW; a physician assistant under chapter 18.71A RCW; an osteopathic physician and surgeon under chapter 18.57 RCW; an optometrist licensed under chapter 18.53 RCW who is certified by the optometry board under RCW 18.53.010 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.53.010; a dentist under chapter 18.32 RCW; a podiatric physician and surgeon under chapter 18.22 RCW; a veterinarian under chapter 18.92 RCW; a registered nurse, advanced practice registered nurse, or licensed practical nurse under chapter 18.79 RCW; a naturopathic physician under chapter 18.36A RCW who is licensed under RCW 18.36A.030 subject to any limitations in RCW 18.36A.040; a pharmacist under chapter 18.64 RCW or a scientific investigator under this chapter, licensed, registered or otherwise permitted insofar as is consistent with those licensing laws to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of their professional practice or research in this state.(b) A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or to administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.(c) A physician licensed to practice medicine and surgery, a physician licensed to practice osteopathic medicine and surgery, a dentist licensed to practice dentistry, a podiatric physician and surgeon licensed to practice podiatric medicine and surgery, a licensed physician assistant or a licensed osteopathic physician assistant specifically approved to prescribe controlled substances by his or her state's medical commission or equivalent and his or her participating physician as defined in RCW 18.71A.010, an advanced practice registered nurse licensed to prescribe controlled substances, or a veterinarian licensed to practice veterinary medicine in any state of the United States.(41) "Prescription" means an order for controlled substances issued by a practitioner duly authorized by law or rule in the state of Washington to prescribe controlled substances within the scope of his or her professional practice for a legitimate medical purpose.(42) "Production" includes the manufacturing, planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance.(43) "Qualifying patient" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(44) "Recognition card" has the meaning provided in RCW 69.51A.010.(45) "Retail outlet" means a location licensed by the board for the retail sale of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products.(46) "Secretary" means the secretary of health or the secretary's designee.(47) "Social equity plan" means a plan that addresses at least some of the elements outlined in this subsection (47), along with any additional plan components or requirements approved by the board following consultation with the task force created in RCW 69.50.336. The plan may include:(a) A statement that indicates how the cannabis licensee will work to promote social equity goals in their community;(b) A description of how the cannabis licensee will meet social equity goals as defined in RCW 69.50.335;(c) The composition of the workforce the licensee has employed or intends to hire; and(d) Business plans involving partnerships or assistance to organizations or residents with connections to populations with a history of high rates of enforcement of cannabis prohibition.(48) "State," unless the context otherwise requires, means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or a territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.(49) "THC concentration" means percent of tetrahydrocannabinol content of any part of the plant Cannabis, or per volume or weight of cannabis product, or the combined percent of tetrahydrocannabinol and tetrahydrocannabinolic acid in any part of the plant Cannabis regardless of moisture content.(50) "Ultimate user" means an individual who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for the individual's own use or for the use of a member of the individual's household or for administering to an animal owned by the individual or by a member of the individual's household.(51) "Unit" means an individual consumable item within a package of one or more consumable items in solid, liquid, gas, or any form intended for human consumption.(52) "Useable cannabis" means dried cannabis flowers. The term "useable cannabis" does not include either cannabis-infused products or cannabis concentrates.(53) "Youth access" means the level of interest persons under the age of ((twenty-one))21 may have in a vapor product, as well as the degree to which the product is available or appealing to such persons, and the likelihood of initiation, use, or addiction by adolescents and young adults.Sec. 10. RCW 69.50.325 and 2025 c 250 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) There shall be a cannabis producer's license regulated by the board and subject to annual renewal. The licensee is authorized to produce: (a) Cannabis for sale at wholesale to cannabis processors and other cannabis producers; (b) immature plants or clones and seeds for sale to cooperatives as described under RCW 69.51A.250; and (c) immature plants or clones and seeds for sale to qualifying patients and designated providers as provided under RCW 69.51A.310. The production, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of cannabis in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed cannabis producer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every cannabis producer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at which the cannabis producer intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a cannabis producer's license shall be ((two hundred fifty dollars))$250. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a cannabis producer's license shall be ((one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars))$1,381. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a cannabis producer intends to produce cannabis.(2) There shall be a cannabis processor's license to process, package, and label cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products for sale at wholesale to cannabis processors and cannabis retailers, and to manufacture, package, and label hemp consumables and hemp-derived cannabinoid products, both as defined in RCW 15.140.020 and in accordance with section 4 of this act, regulated by the board and subject to annual renewal. The processing, packaging, possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of cannabis, useable cannabis, cannabis-infused products, and cannabis concentrates in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 69.51A RCW and the rules adopted to implement and enforce these chapters, by a validly licensed cannabis processor, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every cannabis processor's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location at which the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a cannabis processor's license shall be ((two hundred fifty dollars))$250. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a cannabis processor's license shall be ((one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars))$1,381. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a cannabis processor intends to process cannabis.(3)(a) There shall be a cannabis retailer's license to sell cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products at retail in retail outlets, regulated by the board and subject to annual renewal. The possession, delivery, distribution, and sale of cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and the rules adopted to implement and enforce it, by a validly licensed cannabis retailer, shall not be a criminal or civil offense under Washington state law. Every cannabis retailer's license shall be issued in the name of the applicant, shall specify the location of the retail outlet the licensee intends to operate, which must be within the state of Washington, and the holder thereof shall not allow any other person to use the license. The application fee for a cannabis retailer's license shall be ((two hundred fifty dollars))$250. The annual fee for issuance and renewal of a cannabis retailer's license shall be ((one thousand three hundred eighty-one dollars))$1,381. A separate license shall be required for each location at which a cannabis retailer intends to sell cannabis concentrates, useable cannabis, and cannabis-infused products.(b)(i) An individual retail licensee and all other persons or entities with a financial or other ownership interest in the business operating under the license are limited, in the aggregate, to holding a collective total of not more than five retail cannabis licenses.(ii) A retail licensee and all other persons or entities with a financial or other ownership interest may not enter into any management agreement under RCW 69.50.331(1)(b)(iv) or any agreement as referenced in RCW 69.50.395, whether or not in exchange for payment, that confers a financial interest across more than five retail cannabis licenses. For the purposes of this subsection, "financial interest" includes, but is not limited to:(A) Any sharing of profits or revenue;(B) Any assistance, coordination, or recommendation for the purchase of cannabis products whereupon pricing is coordinated or discounted;(C) The common use of intellectual property assets such as branding, trade names, logos, social media accounts, or websites;(D) Any operational control over the business or operational support for typical day-to-day business operations, including core business or executive functions of the retail cannabis license;(E) Any sharing or coordination of marketing and advertising efforts or expenses; and(F) Any coordinated sharing of employment or hiring decisions, including the shared employment of individuals.(c)(i) A cannabis retailer's license is subject to forfeiture in accordance with rules adopted by the board pursuant to this section.(ii) The board shall adopt rules to establish a license forfeiture process for a licensed cannabis retailer that is not fully operational and open to the public within a specified period from the date of license issuance, as established by the board, subject to the following restrictions:(A) No cannabis retailer's license may be subject to forfeiture within the first nine months of license issuance; and(B) The board must require license forfeiture on or before twenty-four calendar months of license issuance if a cannabis retailer is not fully operational and open to the public, unless the board determines that circumstances out of the licensee's control are preventing the licensee from becoming fully operational and that, in the board's discretion, the circumstances warrant extending the forfeiture period beyond ((twenty-four))24 calendar months.(iii) The board has discretion in adopting rules under this subsection (3)(c).(iv) This subsection (3)(c) applies to cannabis retailer's licenses issued before and after July 23, 2017. However, no license of a cannabis retailer that otherwise meets the conditions for license forfeiture established pursuant to this subsection (3)(c) may be subject to forfeiture within the first nine calendar months of July 23, 2017.(v) The board may not require license forfeiture if the licensee has been incapable of opening a fully operational retail cannabis business due to actions by the city, town, or county with jurisdiction over the licensee that include any of the following:(A) The adoption of a ban or moratorium that prohibits the opening of a retail cannabis business; or(B) The adoption of an ordinance or regulation related to zoning, business licensing, land use, or other regulatory measure that has the effect of preventing a licensee from receiving an occupancy permit from the jurisdiction or which otherwise prevents a licensed cannabis retailer from becoming operational.(d) The board may issue cannabis retailer licenses pursuant to this chapter and RCW 69.50.335.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 11. Section 5 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 12. (1) Sections 1 through 4, 6 through 8, and 10 of this act take effect July 1, 2026.(2) Section 9 of this act takes effect June 30, 2027.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 13. Section 8 of this act expires June 30, 2027.--- END ---